Hawaii statutes.
§712-1209.6 Prostitution; motion to vacate
conviction. (1) A person convicted of committing the offense of
prostitution under section 712-1200, loitering for the purpose of engaging in
or advancing prostitution under section 712-1206, street solicitation of
prostitution in designated areas under section 712-1207, or convicted of a
lesser offense when originally charged with a violation of section 712-1200,
712-1206, or 712-1207, may file a motion to vacate the conviction if the
defendant's participation in the offense was the result of the person having
been a victim of:

(a) Sex trafficking under section 712-1202 or
promoting prostitution under section 712-1203; or

(b) A severe form of trafficking in persons as
defined in title 22 United States Code section 7102(9)(A).

(2) A motion filed under this section shall:

(a) Be in writing;

(b) Be signed and sworn to by the petitioner;

(c) Be made within six years after the date that the
person ceases to be a victim as described in subsection (1), subject to
reasonable concerns for the safety of the defendant, family members of the
defendant, or other victims of the trafficking that may be jeopardized by the
bringing of a motion, or for other reasons consistent with the purpose of this
section;

(d) Describe all the grounds and evidence for
vacation of a conviction which are available to the petitioner and of which the
petitioner has or by the exercise of reasonable diligence should have
knowledge, and provide copies of any official documents showing that the
defendant is entitled to relief under this section; and

(e) Be subject to the review and written approval of
the state agency or county prosecutor responsible for prosecuting the offense
that is the subject of the motion to vacate conviction.

(3) The court shall hold a hearing on a motion
filed under this section if the motion satisfies the requirements of subsection
(2); provided that the court may dismiss a motion without a hearing if the
court finds that the motion fails to assert grounds on which relief may be
granted.

(4) If the court grants a motion filed under
this section, the court shall vacate the conviction.

(5) A person making a motion to vacate
pursuant to this section has the burden of proof by a preponderance of the
evidence.

(6) This section shall not apply to a motion
to vacate a conviction under this chapter for:

(a) Sex trafficking under section 712-1202;

(b) Promoting prostitution under section 712-1203;
or

(c) A person who pays, agrees to pay or offers a fee
to another person to engage in sexual conduct. [L 2012, c 216, §2; am L 2015, c
35, §29; am L 2016, c 206, §16]

COMMENTARY ON §712-1209.6

Act 216, Session Laws 2012, added this section to:
(1) authorize a person convicted of committing the offense of prostitution to file
a motion to vacate the conviction under certain circumstances; and (2)
establish procedures for the motion to vacate the conviction. The legislature
found that human trafficking, consisting of the subjugation, recruitment,
harboring, or transportation of people for the purpose of forced labor or
services, or commercial sexual exploitation, was one of the fastest growing
criminal industries. Act 216 would assist in combating human trafficking
by allowing trafficking victims who were forced into prostitution to file a
motion to have their prostitution convictions vacated from their records.
Conference Committee Report No. 109-12.

Act 35, Session Laws 2015, amended subsection (1)(b) by
changing: (1) the phrase "severe form of trafficking" to
"severe form of trafficking in persons"; and (2) "title 22
United States Code section 7102(13)" to "title 22 United States Code
section 7102(9)(A)."

Act 206, Session Laws 2016, amended this section to conform
to amendments made to other sections in the Hawaii Revised Statutes by Act
206. Senate Standing Committee Report No. 3450.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next